Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.070

Individual unable to sign—Signature.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 64.08.100, if an individual is physically unable to sign a record, the individual may direct an individual other than the notarial officer to sign the individual's name on the record. The notarial officer shall insert "signature affixed by (name of other individual) at the direction of (name of individual)" or words of similar import.

[ 2017 c 281 s 9.]